Wisconsin, session 2025, SB419.
do enact as follows:SB419,11Section 1. 146.81 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:SB419,3,82146.81 (4) “Patient health care records” means all records related to the 3health of a patient prepared by or under the supervision of a health care provider; 4and all records made by an ambulance service provider, as defined in s. 256.01 (3), 5an emergency medical services practitioner, as defined in s. 256.01 (5), or an 6emergency medical responder, as defined in s. 256.01 (4p), in administering 7emergency care procedures to and handling and transporting sick, disabled, or 8injured individuals. “Patient health care records” includes billing statements and 1invoices for treatment or services provided by a health care provider and includes 2health summary forms prepared under s. 302.388 (2). “Patient health care records” 3does not include those records subject to s. 51.30, reports collected under s. 69.186, 4records of tests administered under s. 252.15 (5g) or (5j), 343.305, 938.296 (4) or (5) 5or 968.38 (4) or, (5), or (6), records related to sales of pseudoephedrine products, as 6defined in s. 961.01 (20c), that are maintained by pharmacies under s. 961.235, 7fetal monitor tracings, as defined under s. 146.817 (1), or a pupil’s physical health 8records maintained by a school under s. 118.125.SB419,29Section 2. 252.11 (5m) of the statutes is amended to read:SB419,3,1510252.11 (5m) A health care professional, as defined in s. 968.38 (1) (a) (ar), 11acting under an order of a court under s. 938.296 (4) or 968.38 (4) may, without first 12obtaining informed consent to the testing, subject an individual to a test or a series 13of tests to ascertain whether that individual is infected with a sexually transmitted 14disease. No sample used for performance of a test under this subsection may 15disclose the name of the test subject.SB419,316Section 3. 252.15 (2m) (b) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB419,3,2117252.15 (2m) (b) 3. HIV testing by a health care professional acting under an 18order of the court under sub. (5j) or s. 938.296 (4) or (5) or 968.38 (4) or, (5), or (6). 19No sample used for laboratory test purposes under this subdivision may disclose the 20name of the HIV test subject, and the HIV test results may not be made part of the 21individual’s permanent medical record.SB419,422Section 4. 252.15 (3m) (d) 14. of the statutes is amended to read:SB419,4,323252.15 (3m) (d) 14. To a person under s. 938.296 (4) (a) to (e) as specified in s. 24938.296 (4); to a person under s. 938.296 (5) (a) to (e) as specified in s. 938.296 (5); to 1a person under s. 968.38 (4) (a) to (c) as specified in s. 968.38 (4); or to a person 2under s. 968.38 (5) (a) (am) to (c) as specified in s. 968.38 (5); or to a person under s. 3968.38 (6) (a) to (c) as specified in s. 968.38 (6).SB419,54Section 5. 252.15 (4) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB419,4,85252.15 (4) (c) A record of the results of an HIV test administered to the 6person, except that results of an HIV test administered under sub. (5g) or (5j) or s. 7938.296 (4) or (5) or 968.38 (4) or, (5), or (6) that include the identity of the test 8subject may not be maintained without the consent of the test subject.SB419,69Section 6. 901.05 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB419,4,1410901.05 (3) The results of a test or tests under s. 938.296 (4) or (5) or 968.38 (4) 11or, (5), or (6) and the fact that a person has been ordered to submit to such a test or 12tests under s. 938.296 (4) or (5) or 968.38 (4) or, (5), or (6) are not admissible during 13the course of a civil or criminal action or proceeding or an administrative 14proceeding.SB419,715Section 7. 968.38 (1) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 968.38 (1) (ar).SB419,816Section 8. 968.38 (1) (ag) of the statutes is created to read:SB419,4,1817968.38 (1) (ag) “Correctional staff member” has the meaning given in s. 18940.225 (5) (ad).SB419,919Section 9. 968.38 (1) (br) of the statutes is created to read:SB419,4,2020968.38 (1) (br) “Prosecutor” has the meaning given in s. 941.375 (1) (am).SB419,1021Section 10. 968.38 (1) (bv) of the statutes is created to read:SB419,4,2322968.38 (1) (bv) “Public safety worker” has the meaning given in s. 941.375 (1) 23(b).SB419,1124Section 11. 968.38 (2m) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB419,5,61968.38 (2m) (intro.) In Except as provided in sub. (2s), in a criminal action 2under s. 941.375 (2) or 946.43 (2m), the district attorney shall apply to the circuit 3court for his or her county for an order requiring the defendant to submit to a test or 4a series of tests administered by a health care professional to detect the presence of 5communicable diseases and to disclose the results of the test or tests as specified in 6sub. (5) (a) (am) to (c), if all of the following apply:SB419,127Section 12. 968.38 (2m) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB419,5,138968.38 (2m) (a) The district attorney has probable cause to believe that the 9act or alleged act of the defendant that constitutes a violation of s. 941.375 (2) or 10946.43 (2m) crime carried a potential for transmitting a communicable disease to 11the victim or alleged victim a public safety worker, prosecutor, or correctional staff 12member and involved the defendant’s blood, semen, vomit, saliva, urine or feces or 13other bodily substance of the defendant.SB419,1314Section 13. 968.38 (2m) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB419,5,1915968.38 (2m) (b) The alleged victim or victim who is not a minor, or the parent 16or guardian of the alleged victim or victim who is a minor A public safety worker, 17prosecutor, or correctional staff member or a person who is authorized to make 18health care decisions on behalf of a public safety worker, prosecutor, or correctional 19staff member requests the district attorney to apply for an order.SB419,1420Section 14. 968.38 (2s) of the statutes is created to read:SB419,6,321968.38 (2s) Regardless of whether criminal proceedings have commenced, the 22district attorney may, at any time, apply to the circuit court for his or her county for 23a waiver of the hearing under sub. (5) and for an emergency order requiring the 24defendant to immediately submit to a test or a series of tests administered by a 1health care professional to detect the presence of communicable diseases and to 2disclose the results of the test or tests as specified in sub. (5) (am) to (c), if all of the 3following apply:SB419,6,44(a) The requirements under sub. (2m) (a) and (b) are met.SB419,6,85(b) A public safety worker, prosecutor, or correctional staff member or a 6person who is authorized to make health care decisions on behalf of a public safety 7worker, prosecutor, or correctional staff member requests the district attorney to 8apply for an emergency order.SB419,6,129(c) The district attorney has probable cause to believe that waiving the 10hearing under sub. (5) and expediting the defendant to submit to testing will 11prevent a public safety worker, prosecutor, or correctional staff member from 12experiencing bodily harm that could result from delaying the test.SB419,1513Section 15. 968.38 (5) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB419,7,1114968.38 (5) (intro.) The court shall set a time for a hearing on the matter under 15sub. (2m) during the preliminary examination, if sub. (3) (a) applies; after the 16defendant is bound over for trial and before a verdict is rendered, if sub. (3) (b) 17applies; after conviction or a finding of not guilty by reason of mental disease or 18defect, if sub. (3) (c) applies; or, subject to s. 971.13 (4), after the determination that 19the defendant is not competent, if sub. (3) (d) applies. The court shall give the 20district attorney and the defendant notice of the hearing at least 72 hours prior to 21the hearing. The defendant may have counsel at the hearing, and counsel may 22examine and cross-examine witnesses. If the court finds probable cause to believe 23that the act or alleged act of the defendant that constitutes a violation of s. 941.375 24(2) or 946.43 (2m) crime carried a potential for transmitting a communicable 1disease to the victim or alleged victim a public safety worker, prosecutor, or 2correctional staff member and involved the defendant’s blood, semen, vomit, saliva, 3urine or feces or other bodily substance of the defendant, the court shall order the 4defendant to submit to a test or a series of tests administered by a health care 5professional to detect the presence of any communicable disease that was 6potentially transmitted by the act or alleged act of the defendant. The court shall 7require the health care professional who performs the test to disclose the test 8results to the defendant. The court shall require the health care professional who 9performs the test to refrain from making the test results part of the defendant’s 10permanent medical record and to disclose the results of the test to any of the 11following:SB419,1612Section 16. 968.38 (5) (a) of the statutes is repealed.SB419,1713Section 17. 968.38 (5) (am) of the statutes is created to read:SB419,7,1514968.38 (5) (am) A public safety worker, prosecutor, or correctional staff 15member who requested the test.SB419,1816Section 18. 968.38 (5) (b) of the statutes is repealed.SB419,1917Section 19. 968.38 (5) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:SB419,7,2018968.38 (5) (bm) A person who is authorized to make health care decisions on 19behalf of a public safety worker, prosecutor, or correctional staff member who 20requested the test.SB419,2021Section 20. 968.38 (5) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB419,8,422968.38 (5) (c) The health care professional who provides care to the alleged 23victim or victim, upon request by the alleged victim or victim or, if the alleged 24victim or victim is a minor, by the parent or guardian of the alleged victim or victim 1a public safety worker, prosecutor, or correctional staff member, upon request of the 2public safety worker, prosecutor, or correctional staff member or a person 3authorized to make health care decisions on behalf of a public safety worker, 4prosecutor, or correctional staff member.SB419,215Section 21. 968.38 (6) of the statutes is created to read:SB419,8,226968.38 (6) The court shall immediately hear an application for an emergency 7order under sub. (2s). If the court finds probable cause to believe that the act or 8alleged act of the defendant that constitutes a crime carried a potential for 9transmitting a communicable disease to a public safety worker, prosecutor, or 10correctional staff member and involved the defendant’s blood, semen, vomit, saliva, 11urine, or feces or other bodily substance of the defendant, and that waiving the 12hearing under sub. (5) and expediting the defendant to submit to testing will 13prevent a public safety worker, prosecutor, or correctional staff member from 14experiencing bodily harm that could result from delaying the test, the court shall 15order the defendant to submit to a test or a series of tests administered by a health 16care professional to detect the presence of any communicable disease that was 17potentially transmitted by the act or alleged act of the defendant. The court shall 18require the health care professional who performs the test to immediately disclose 19the test results to the defendant. The court shall require the health care 20professional who performs the test to refrain from making the test results part of 21the defendant’s permanent medical record and to disclose the results of the test to 22any of the following: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb419 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb419 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB419 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB419 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB419: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting